South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4026.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  In accordance with the provisions of Section 36(B)(2) and (3), Article III, Constitution of South Carolina, 1895, and Section 11-11-320(C) and (D) of the S.C. Code, there is appropriated from the monies available in the Capital Reserve Fund for Fiscal Year 2024-2025 the following amounts: (1)   H090 - The Citadel (a)   Engineering Building Replacement                                          $    9,900,000 (b)   Renovation of Workforce Housing                                           $    2,000,000 (c)   Deas Hall Renovation                                                                         $ 4,930,004 (2)   H120 - Clemson University (a)   NextGen Computing Complex                                                $  13,200,000 (b)   Life Sciences Lab Building                                                     $    4,300,000 (3)   H170 - Coastal Carolina Wheelwright Auditorium Renovation                                              $    4,488,000 (4)   H180 - Francis Marion University (a)   Leatherman Science Facility/McNair Science Building Renovation                                                                         $ 1,320,000 (b)   Hyman Fine Arts Center Building Renovation                          $    4,950,000 (5)   H210 - Lander University Marion Carnell Learning Center Renovation                                   $    5,940,000 (6)   H240 - South Carolina State University Renovation of Dr. Maceo O. Nance Hall (Establishment of the new College of Agriculture, Family and Consumer Sciences)       $    9,900,000 (7)   H270 - USC - Columbia Battery Center Facility                                                                   $  13,200,000 (8)   H290 - USC - Aiken Science Building Enhancement and Modernization                          $    5,280,000 (9)   H340 - USC - Upstate Nursing/Health Sciences Building                                                   $    2,640,000 (10) H360 - USC - Beaufort New Convocation Center                                                               $    3,000,000 (11) H370   USC Lancaster Maintenance, Renovation, and Replacement                                   $    1,320,000 (12) H380 - USC - Salkehatchie Maintenance, Renovation, and Replacement                                   $    1,320,000 (13) H390 - USC - Sumter (a)   Facilities Management Center                                                 $    1,980,000 (b)   Collaboration Lab                                                                  $    5,280,000 (14) H400 - USC - Union Maintenance, Renovation, and Replacement                                    $    1,320,000 (15) H470 - Winthrop University (a)   Administrative Building Renovation                                        $    4,620,000 (b)   Academic Renovations & New Strategic Academic Programs  $    2,309,996 (16) H510 - Medical University of South Carolina (a)   Southeastern Health AI Consortium                                         $    6,600,000 (b)   Campus Renewal Projects relating to MEP Infrastructure and Exterior Envelope Repair                                              $  13,200,000 (17) H590 - Board for Technical and Comprehensive Education (a)   Aiken Technical College (i)    Equipment Funding                                                            $    1,818,550 (ii)   Demolition of the 100/200 and 300 Buildings                       $       411,332 (b)   Central Carolina Technical College (i)    Kershaw Campus Expansion                                               $    6,600,000 (ii)   Technical High School Workforce Center                             $  10,560,000 (c)   Denmark Technical College New Building - Cybersecurity, Energy, Healthcare                       $    2,310,000 (d)   Greenville Technical College Center for Industrial Cyber Security and AI                                 $  16,000,000 (e)   Midlands Technical College Advanced Trades Center                                                            $  16,000,000 (f)   Orangeburg-Calhoun Technical College Health Sciences Building                                                            $ 5,086,000 (18) J020 - Department of Health and Human Services Neurological Critical Care and Rehabilitation Services in South Carolina                                                                       $150,000,000 (19) P240 - Department of Natural Resources State Lakes - High Hazard Dams                                                    $    5,000,000 (20) D500 - Department of Administration (a)   State-Owned Buildings Security Upgrades                               $  24,000,000 (b)   Modernized IT Service Management Platform                          $    9,000,000 SECTION 2.  The Comptroller General shall post the appropriations contained in this joint resolution as provided in Section 11-11-320(D) of the S.C. Code. Unexpended funds appropriated pursuant to this joint resolution may be carried forward to succeeding fiscal years and expended for the same purposes. SECTION 3.  This joint resolution takes effect thirty days after the completion of the 2024-2025 Fiscal Year in accordance with the provisions of Section 36(B)(3)(a), Article III, Constitution of South Carolina, 1895, and Section 11-11-320(D)(1) of the S.C. Code. ----XX----